Illinois, session 104th, HB4523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4 and 6 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/4)  (from Ch. 5, par. 804)7    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    1. "Director" means Director of the Illinois Department of 9Agriculture or his authorized representative.10    2. "Active Ingredient" means any ingredient which will 11prevent, destroy, repel, control or mitigate a pest or which 12will act as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.13    3. "Adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if the 14strength or purity is not within the standard of quality 15expressed on the labeling under which it is sold, distributed 16or used, including any substance which has been substituted 17wholly or in part for the pesticide as specified on the 18labeling under which it is sold, distributed or used, or if any 19valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in 20part abstracted.21    4. "Agricultural Commodity" means produce of the land, 22including, but not limited to, plants and plant parts, 23livestock and poultry and livestock or poultry products,   HB4523- 2 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1seeds, sod, shrubs and other products of agricultural origin 2including the premises necessary to and used directly in 3agricultural production. Agricultural commodity also includes 4aquatic products, including any aquatic plants and animals or 5their by-products that are produced, grown, managed, harvested 6and marketed on an annual, semi-annual, biennial or short-term 7basis, in permitted aquaculture facilities.8    5. "Animal" means all vertebrate and invertebrate species 9including, but not limited to, man and other mammals, birds, 10fish, and shellfish.11    5.5. "Barrier mosquitocide" means a pesticide that is 12formulated to kill adult mosquitoes and that is applied so as 13to leave a residual mosquitocidal coating on natural or 14manmade surfaces. "Barrier mosquitocide" does not include a 15product that is exempt from registration under the Federal 16Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, or rules adopted 17pursuant to that Act.18    5.6. "Barrier mosquitocide treatment" means application of 19a barrier mosquitocide to a natural or manmade surface. 20    6. "Beneficial Insects" means those insects which during 21their life cycle are effective pollinators of plants, 22predators of pests or are otherwise beneficial.23    7. "Certified applicator".24        A. "Certified applicator" means any individual who is 25    certified under this Act to purchase, use, or supervise 26    the use of pesticides which are classified for restricted   HB4523- 3 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    use.2        B. "Private applicator" means a certified applicator 3    who purchases, uses, or supervises the use of any 4    pesticide classified for restricted use, for the purpose 5    of producing any agricultural commodity on property owned, 6    rented, or otherwise controlled by him or his employer, or 7    applied to other property if done without compensation 8    other than trading of personal services between no more 9    than 2 producers of agricultural commodities.10        C. "Licensed Commercial Applicator" means a certified 11    applicator, whether or not he is a private applicator with 12    respect to some uses, who owns or manages a business that 13    is engaged in applying pesticides, whether classified for 14    general or restricted use, for hire. The term also applies 15    to a certified applicator who uses or supervises the use 16    of pesticides, whether classified for general or 17    restricted use, for any purpose or on property of others 18    excluding those specified by subparagraphs 7 (B), (D), (E) 19    of Section 4 of this Act.20        D. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" means a 21    certified applicator who uses or supervises the use of 22    pesticides classified for general or restricted use for 23    any purpose on property of an employer when such activity 24    is a requirement of the terms of employment and such 25    application of pesticides under this certification is 26    limited to property under the control of the employer only   HB4523- 4 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    and includes, but is not limited to, the use or 2    supervision of the use of pesticides in a greenhouse 3    setting. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" also 4    includes a certified applicator who uses or supervises the 5    use of pesticides classified for general or restricted use 6    as an employee of a state agency, municipality, or other 7    duly constituted governmental agency or unit.8    8. "Defoliant" means any substance or combination of 9substances which cause leaves or foliage to drop from a plant 10with or without causing abscission.11    9. "Desiccant" means any substance or combination of 12substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying 13of plant tissue.14    10. "Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other 15than a firearm or equipment for application of pesticides when 16sold separately from pesticides, which is intended for 17trapping, repelling, destroying, or mitigating any pest, other 18than bacteria, virus, or other microorganisms on or living in 19man or other living animals.20    11. "Distribute" means offer or hold for sale, sell, 21barter, ship, deliver for shipment, receive and then deliver, 22or offer to deliver pesticides, within the State.23    12. "Environment" includes water, air, land, and all 24plants and animals including man, living therein and the 25interrelationships which exist among these.26    13. "Equipment" means any type of instruments and   HB4523- 5 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1contrivances using motorized, mechanical or pressure power 2which is used to apply any pesticide, excluding pressurized 3hand-size household apparatus containing dilute ready to apply 4pesticide or used to apply household pesticides.5    14. "FIFRA" means the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and 6Rodenticide Act, as amended.7    15. "Fungi" means any non-chlorophyll bearing 8thallophytes, any non-chlorophyll bearing plant of a lower 9order than mosses or liverworts, as for example rust, smut, 10mildew, mold, yeast and bacteria, except those on or in living 11animals including man and those on or in processed foods, 12beverages or pharmaceuticals.13    16. "Household Substance" means any pesticide customarily 14produced and distributed for use by individuals in or about 15the household.16    17. "Imminent Hazard" means a situation which exists when 17continued use of a pesticide would likely result in 18unreasonable adverse effects on the environment or will 19involve unreasonable hazard to the survival of a species 20declared endangered by the U.S. Secretary of the Interior or 21to species declared to be protected by the Illinois Department 22of Natural Resources.23    18. "Inert Ingredient" means an ingredient which is not an 24active ingredient.25    19. "Ingredient Statement" means a statement of the name 26and percentage of each active ingredient together with the   HB4523- 6 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1total percentage of inert ingredients in a pesticide and for 2pesticides containing arsenic in any form, the ingredient 3statement shall include percentage of total and water soluble 4arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. In the case of 5spray adjuvants the ingredient statement need contain only the 6names of the functioning agents and the total percent of those 7constituents ineffective as spray adjuvants.8    20. "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate 9animals generally having the body more or less obviously 10segmented for the most part belonging to the class Insects, 11comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as for example 12beetles, caterpillars, and flies. This definition encompasses 13other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless 14and usually have more than 6 legs as for example spiders, 15mites, ticks, centipedes, and millipedes.16    21. "Label" means the written, printed or graphic matter 17on or attached to the pesticide or device or any of its 18containers or wrappings.19    22. "Labeling" means the label and all other written, 20printed or graphic matter: (a) on the pesticide or device or 21any of its containers or wrappings, (b) accompanying the 22pesticide or device or referring to it in any other media used 23to disseminate information to the public, (c) to which 24reference is made to the pesticide or device except when 25references are made to current official publications of the U. 26S. Environmental Protection Agency, Departments of   HB4523- 7 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1Agriculture, Health, Education and Welfare or other Federal 2Government institutions, the state experiment station or 3colleges of agriculture or other similar state institution 4authorized to conduct research in the field of pesticides.5    23. "Land" means all land and water area including 6airspace, and all plants, animals, structures, buildings, 7contrivances, and machinery appurtenant thereto or situated 8thereon, fixed or mobile, including any used for 9transportation.10    24. "Licensed Operator" means a person employed to apply 11pesticides to the lands of others under the direction of a 12"licensed commercial applicator" or a "licensed commercial 13not-for-hire applicator".14    25. "Nematode" means invertebrate animals of the phylum 15nemathelminthes and class nematoda, also referred to as nemas 16or eelworms, which are unsegmented roundworms with elongated 17fusiform or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle and 18inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts.19    26. "Permit" means a written statement issued by the 20Director or his authorized agent, authorizing certain acts of 21pesticide purchase or of pesticide use or application on an 22interim basis prior to normal certification, registration, or 23licensing.24    27. "Person" means any individual, partnership, 25association, fiduciary, corporation, or any organized group of 26persons whether incorporated or not.  HB4523- 8 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    28. "Pest" means (a) any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, 2weed, or (b) any other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or 3animal life or virus, bacteria, or other microorganism, 4excluding virus, bacteria, or other microorganism on or in 5living animals including man, which the Director declares to 6be a pest.7    29. "Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of 8substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or 9mitigating any pest or any substance or mixture of substances 10intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.11    30. "Pesticide Dealer" means any person who distributes 12registered pesticides to the user.13    31. "Plant Regulator" means any substance or mixture of 14substances intended through physiological action to affect the 15rate of growth or maturation or otherwise alter the behavior 16of ornamental or crop plants or the produce thereof. This does 17not include substances which are not intended as plant 18nutrient trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant or seed 19inoculants or soil conditioners or amendments.20    32. "Protect Health and Environment" means to guard 21against any unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.22    33. "Registrant" means a person who has registered any 23pesticide pursuant to the provision of FIFRA and this Act.24    34. "Restricted Use Pesticide" means any pesticide with 25one or more of its uses classified as restricted by order of 26the Administrator of USEPA.  HB4523- 9 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    35. "SLN Registration" means registration of a pesticide 2for use under conditions of special local need as defined by 3FIFRA.4    36. "State Restricted Pesticide Use" means any pesticide 5use which the Director determines, subsequent to public 6hearing, that an additional restriction for that use is needed 7to prevent unreasonable adverse effects.8    37. "Structural Pest" means any pests which attack and 9destroy buildings and other structures or which attack 10clothing, stored food, commodities stored at food 11manufacturing and processing facilities or manufactured and 12processed goods.13    38. "Unreasonable Adverse Effects on the Environment" 14means the unreasonable risk to the environment, including man, 15from the use of any pesticide, when taking into account 16accrued benefits of as well as the economic, social, and 17environmental costs of its use.18    39. "USEPA" means United States Environmental Protection 19Agency.20    40. "Use inconsistent with the label" means to use a 21pesticide in a manner not consistent with the label 22instruction, the definition adopted in FIFRA as interpreted by 23USEPA shall apply in Illinois.24    41. "Weed" means any plant growing in a place where it is 25not wanted.26    42. "Wildlife" means all living things, not human,   HB4523- 10 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1domestic, or pests.2    43. "Bulk pesticide" means any registered pesticide which 3is transported or held in an individual container in undivided 4quantities of greater than 55 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 5100 pounds net dry weight.6    44. "Bulk repackaging" means the transfer of a registered 7pesticide from one bulk container (containing undivided 8quantities of greater than 100 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 9100 pounds net dry weight) to another bulk container 10(containing undivided quantities of greater than 100 U.S. 11gallons liquid measure or 100 pounds net dry weight) in an 12unaltered state in preparation for sale or distribution to 13another person.14    45. "Business" means any individual, partnership, 15corporation or association engaged in a business operation for 16the purpose of selling or distributing pesticides or providing 17the service of application of pesticides in this State.18    46. "Facility" means any building or structure and all 19real property contiguous thereto, including all equipment 20fixed thereon used for the operation of the business.21    47. "Chemigation" means the application of a pesticide 22through the systems or equipment employed for the primary 23purpose of irrigation of land and crops.24    48. "Use" means any activity covered by the pesticide 25label, including, but not limited to, application of 26pesticide, mixing and loading, storage of pesticides or   HB4523- 11 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1pesticide containers, disposal of pesticides and pesticide 2containers and reentry into treated sites or areas.3    49. "Education course" means a course approved by the 4Department of Agriculture that may be used by a certified 5applicator, licensed operator, or registered pesticide dealer 6to meet renewal requirements under the Act.7    50. "License transfer" means the transfer of an existing 8license or certification by the Department from one certified 9applicator or operator to another certified applicator or 10operator for the period of time remaining on the license 11before renewal. 12    51. "Perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance" or 13"PFAS" means a chemical in the class of fluorinated organic 14chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon 15atom.16    52. "Intentionally added PFAS" means any chemical that is 17a PFAS and that is deliberately added during the manufacture 18of a product if the continued presence of the chemical is 19desired in the final product or desired in one of the product's 20components to perform a specific function in the final 21product. "Intentionally added PFAS" includes (i) any 22degradation byproduct of a chemical that is a PFAS, (ii) any 23chemical that is a PFAS and that is a breakdown product of an 24added chemical, and (iii) any chemical that is a PFAS and that 25is used as a processing agent, mold release agent, or 26intermediate in any situation in which any PFAS is detected in   HB4523- 12 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1the final covered product. "Intentionally added PFAS" does not 2include a chemical that is a PFAS and that is present in the 3product due to use of water that contains the chemical if the 4manufacturer took no action that resulted in the chemical 5being present in the water.6(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 104-363, eff. 1-1-26.) 7    (415 ILCS 60/6)  (from Ch. 5, par. 806)8    Sec. 6. Registration. 9    1. Every pesticide which is distributed, sold, offered for 10sale within this State, delivered for transportation or 11transported in interstate commerce or between points within 12the State through any point outside the State, shall be 13registered with the Director or his designated agent, subject 14to provisions of this Act. Such registration shall be for a 15period determined under subsection item 1.5 of this Section 16and shall expire on December 31st. Registration is not 17required if a pesticide is shipped from one plant or warehouse 18to another plant or warehouse by the same person and is used 19solely at such plant or warehouse as a constituent part to make 20a pesticide which is registered under provisions of this Act 21and FIFRA.22    1.5. In order to stagger product registrations, the 23Department shall, for the 2011 registration year, register 24half of the applicants and their products for one year and the 25other half for 2 years. Thereafter, a business registration   HB4523- 13 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1and product registration shall be for 2 years. 2    2. Registration applicant shall file a statement with the 3Director which shall include:4        A. The name and address of the applicant and the name 5    and address of the person whose name will appear on the 6    label if different from the applicant's.7        B. The name of the pesticide.8        C. A copy of the labeling accompanying the pesticide 9    under customary conditions of distribution, sale and use, 10    including ingredient statement, direction for use, use 11    classification, and precautionary or warning statements.12    3. The Director may require the submission of complete 13formula data.14    4. The Director may require a full description of tests 15made and the results thereof, upon which the claims are based, 16for any pesticide not registered pursuant to FIFRA, or on any 17pesticide under consideration to be classified for restricted 18use.19        A. The Director will not consider data he required of 20    the initial registrant of a pesticide in support of 21    another applicants' registration unless the subsequent 22    applicant has obtained written permission to use such 23    data.24        B. In the case of renewal registration, the Director 25    may accept a statement only with respect to information 26    which is different from that furnished previously.  HB4523- 14 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    5. The Director may prescribe other requirements to 2support a pesticide registration by regulation.3    6. For the years 2024 through 2025, the product 4registration fee shall be $800 per product per 2-year 5registration period and shall be paid at the time of 6registration. For the year 2026 and for each year thereafter, 7the product registration fee shall be $850 per product per 82-year registration period and shall be paid at the time of 9registration. 10    For the years 2024 through 2025, the business registration 11fee shall be $1000 per 2-year registration period and shall be 12paid at the time of registration. For the year 2026 and for 13each year thereafter, the business registration fee shall be 14$1,050 per 2-year registration period and shall be paid at the 15time of registration. Each legal entity of the business shall 16pay the business registration fee.17    For the years preceding the year 2004, any applicant 18requesting an experimental use permit shall pay the annual fee 19of $100 per permit and all special local need pesticide 20registration applicants shall pay an annual fee of $100 per 21product. For the years 2004 through 2010, the annual 22experimental use permit fee and special local need pesticide 23registration fee is $200 per permit. For the years 2011 and 24thereafter, the annual experimental use permit and special 25local need pesticide registration fee shall be $300 per 26product. Subsequent SLN registrations for a pesticide already   HB4523- 15 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1registered shall be exempted from the registration fee.2        A. All registration accepted and approved by the 3    Director shall expire on the 31st day of December in any 4    one year unless cancelled. Registration for a special 5    local need may be granted for a specific period of time 6    with the approval date and expiration date specified.7        B. If a registration for special local need granted by 8    the Director does not receive approval of the 9    Administrator of USEPA, the registration shall expire on 10    the date of the Administrator's disapproval.11    7. Registrations approved and accepted by the Director and 12in effect on the 31st day of December, for which renewal 13application is made, shall continue in full force and effect 14until the Director notifies the registrant that the renewal 15has been approved and accepted or the registration is denied 16under this Act. Renewal registration forms will be provided to 17applicants by the Director.18    8. If the renewal of a pesticide registration is not filed 19within 30 days of the date of expiration, a penalty late 20registration assessment of $100 per product shall apply in 21addition to the regular product registration fee. The late 22registration assessment shall not apply if the applicant 23furnishes an affidavit certifying that no unregulated 24pesticide was distributed or sold during the period of 25registration. The late assessment is not a bar to prosecution 26for doing business without proper registry.  HB4523- 16 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    9. The Director may prescribe by regulation to allow 2pesticide use for a special local need, pursuant to FIFRA. 3    10. The Director may prescribe by regulation the 4provisions for and requirements of registering a pesticide 5intended for experimental use.6    11. The Director shall not make any lack of essentiality a 7criterion for denial of registration of any pesticide. Where 2 8pesticides meet the requirements, one should not be registered 9in preference to the other.10    12. It shall be the duty of the pesticide registrant to 11properly dispose of any pesticide the registration of which 12has been suspended, revoked or cancelled or which is otherwise 13not properly registered in the State.14    13. Beginning January 1, 2027, a statement under 15subsection 2 of this Section shall include either a statement 16that the pesticide contains no chemical that is a PFAS or, if 17the pesticide (including its active and inert ingredients) 18contains any chemical that is a PFAS, the following 19information:20        A. the name and purpose for which each chemical that 21    is a PFAS is used in the pesticide, including its active 22    and inert ingredients;23        B. the amount of each chemical that is in the 24    pesticide and that is a PFAS, identified by its name, 25    chemical structure, analytical methods, Chemical Abstracts 26    Service Registry Number, or other unique method approved   HB4523- 17 -LRB104 18016 BDA 31453 b1    by the Director; and2        C. any additional information required by rule by the 3    Director.4    The Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules 5implementing this subsection 13.6    14. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Director shall not 7register any pesticide product that contains any chemical that 8is an intentionally added PFAS, and the use of any pesticide 9that contains any chemical that is an intentionally added PFAS 10is prohibited. The Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules 11implementing this subsection 14.12    15. Beginning January 1, 2030, the use of any spray 13adjuvant that contains any chemical that is an intentionally 14added PFAS is prohibited. The Department of Agriculture shall 15adopt rules implementing this subsection 15.16(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24; 104-363, eff. 1-1-26.)